Utah statutes.
77-5-8.   Two-thirds vote necessary for conviction.

The officer shall not be convicted on impeachment without the concurrence of two-thirds of the senators elected, voting by ayes and nays, and if two-thirds of the senators elected do not concur in a conviction, he shall be acquitted.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

